Vermont, session 2025-2026, H858.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 3 V.S.A. § 912 is added to read:
§ 912. DESIGNATION OF SWORN LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICERS
AND STATE FIREFIGHTERS; STATEWIDE BARGAINING
RIGHTS
VT LEG #386218 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.858
2026 Page 2 of 3
(a) Notwithstanding section 927 of this chapter, the following employees
shall be members of a single, separate statewide collective bargaining unit, as
determined to be appropriate by the Board pursuant to section 941 of this
chapter, for the purpose of bargaining collectively pursuant to this chapter:
(1) employees of the following departments who are law enforcement
officers certified pursuant to 20 V.S.A. chapter 151:
(A) Department of Fish and Wildlife;
(B) Department of Liquor and Lottery; and
(C) Department of Motor Vehicles;
(2) full-time firefighters employed by the State; and
(3) any law enforcement officer certified pursuant to 20 V.S.A. chapter
151 who is employed by the State of Vermont and is not excluded pursuant to
subsection (b) of this section.
(b) The following employees are excluded from the bargaining unit created
pursuant to this section:
(1) any managerial, confidential, or supervisory employees who would
otherwise qualify for inclusion in the bargaining unit pursuant to subsection (a)
of this section;
(2) any employee covered by current collective bargaining agreements
between:
VT LEG #386218 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.858
2026 Page 3 of 3
(A) the State of Vermont and the Vermont Troopers’ Association,
Inc.—State Police Bargaining Unit;
(B) the State of Vermont and the Vermont State Employees’
Association, Inc.—Supervisory Bargaining Unit; and
(C) the Vermont Department of State’s Attorneys and Sheriffs and
the Vermont State Employees’ Association, Inc.—State Deputy Sheriffs
Bargaining Unit.
(c) The bargaining unit created pursuant to this section shall be referred to
as the State Law Enforcement and Firefighters Bargaining Unit.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026, and shall apply to collective
bargaining agreements and collective bargaining negotiations commencing on
or after that date.
VT LEG #386218 v.1